Arkansas, session 2025, SB131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1120 is amended to read as follows:
26-26-1120. Disabled persons — Definition.
(a) As used in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 79, “disabled person”
means a person who:
(1) Is disabled for purposes of Title XIX of the Social Security
Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., as in effect on January 1, 2003, for any
period during the calendar year;
(2) Is a permanently and totally disabled veteran as defined by
38 C.F.R. § 4.1 et seq., Part IV, as in effect on January 1, 2003; or
(3) Has received permanent and total disability insurance
benefits for any period of time during the calendar year.
(b)(1) When a disabled person or a person sixty-five (65) years of age
or older sells his or her real property, the purchaser shall not be entitled
*CEB023*
02-24-2025 10:00:22 CEB023

As Engrossed: S2/24/25 SB131
to claim any reduction to the real property's assessed value.
(2) On or after January 1 of the year following the date of the
sale, the county assessor shall assess the real property at its full market
value, unadjusted for assessment limitations required by Arkansas
Constitution, Amendment 79.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1123 is amended to read as follows:
26-26-1123. Sale of real property.
(a) When a person sells his or her purchases real property, the county
assessor shall assess the real property at twenty percent (20%) of the
appraised value at the next assessment date after on the date of the transfer
of title to the real property.
(b) The owner of real property to whom title is transferred by a sale
is not then immediately entitled to claim any limitation on future increases
to the assessed value of the real property until the second assessment date
after the date of the transfer of title to the real property as described in
Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 79.
(c) This section does not The protections under this section and under
Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 79 apply to any transfer of title to real
property claimed as a homestead in which the owner or beneficiary of the
homestead retains a life-estate interest in the homestead following the
transfer of title to the real property.
(d) This section does not apply to the purchase of a homestead by a
person who is disabled or is sixty-five (65) years of age or older whose
assessed or taxable value of his or her homestead cannot be increased for any
reason after the date of purchase unless substantial improvements are made to
the homestead as provided in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 79.

/s/J. Bryant







02-24-2025 10:00:22 CEB023